Florida, session 2026, HB1089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
12
13 Section 1. Subsections (2) through (23) of section
14 403.706, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3)
15 through (24), respectively, present subsections (4), (6), (7),
16 and (20) are amended, and a new subsection (2) is added to that
17 section, to read:
18 403.706 Local government solid waste responsibilities.—
19 (2)(a) A local government may not issue a construction
20 permit pursuant to s. 403.707 for a new solid waste disposal
21 facility that uses an ash-producing incinerator or for a waste-
22 to-energy facility if the proposed location of such facility is
23 sited within 1 mile of any impoundment area authorized by
24 Congress with an effective interior storage of at least 100
25 acres for purposes of capturing, storing, and distributing
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
26 surface water, improving hydroperiods and hydropatterns in any
27 water conservation area, increasing spatial extent of wetlands,
28 benefiting any federally listed threatened and endangered
29 species, flood mitigation, or groundwater recharge.
30 (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to:
31 1. Any canal.
32 2. Any existing construction, current operation, or
33 modification to such structure or operation in existence as of
34 July 1, 2026.
35 3. Any parcel located in a county with a population of
36 less than 1.7 million according to the United States 2020
37 decennial census.
38 (5)(4)(a) In order to promote the production of renewable
39 energy from solid waste, each megawatt-hour produced by a
40 renewable energy facility using solid waste as a fuel shall
41 count as 1 ton of recycled material and shall be applied toward
42 meeting the recycling goals set forth in this section. If a
43 county creating renewable energy from solid waste implements and
44 maintains a program to recycle at least 50 percent of municipal
45 solid waste by a means other than creating renewable energy,
46 that county shall count 1.25 tons of recycled material for each
47 megawatt-hour produced. If waste originates from a county other
48 than the county in which the renewable energy facility resides,
49 the originating county shall receive such recycling credit. Any
50 byproduct resulting from the creation of renewable energy that
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
51 is recycled shall count towards the county recycling goals in
52 accordance with the methods and criteria developed pursuant to
53 paragraph (3)(h) (2)(h).
54 (b) A county may receive credit for one-half of the
55 recycling goal set forth in subsection (3) (2) from the use of
56 yard trash, or other clean wood waste or paper waste, in
57 innovative programs including, but not limited to, programs that
58 produce alternative clean-burning fuels such as ethanol or that
59 provide for the conversion of yard trash or other clean wood
60 waste or paper waste to clean-burning fuel for the production of
61 energy for use at facilities other than a waste-to-energy
62 facility as defined in s. 403.7061. The provisions of this
63 paragraph apply only if a county can demonstrate that:
64 1. The county has implemented a yard trash mulching or
65 composting program, and
66 2. As part of the program, compost and mulch made from
67 yard trash is available to the general public and in use at
68 county-owned or maintained and municipally owned or maintained
69 facilities in the county and state agencies operating in the
70 county as required by this section.
71 (c) A county with a population of 100,000 or less may
72 provide its residents with the opportunity to recycle in lieu of
73 achieving the goal set forth in this section. For the purposes
74 of this section, the "opportunity to recycle" means that the
75 county:
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
76 1.a. Provides a system for separating and collecting
77 recyclable materials prior to disposal that is located at a
78 solid waste management facility or solid waste disposal area; or
79 b. Provides a system of places within the county for
80 collection of source-separated recyclable materials.
81 2. Provides a public education and promotion program that
82 is conducted to inform its residents of the opportunity to
83 recycle, encourages source separation of recyclable materials,
84 and promotes the benefits of reducing, reusing, recycling, and
85 composting materials.
86 (7)(6) The department may reduce or modify the municipal
87 solid waste recycling goal that a county is required to achieve
88 pursuant to subsection (3) (2) if the county demonstrates to the
89 department that:
90 (a) The achievement of the goal set forth in subsection
91 (3)(2) would have an adverse effect on the financial obligations
92 of a county that are directly related to a waste-to-energy
93 facility owned or operated by or on behalf of the county; and
94 (b) The county cannot remove normally combustible
95 materials from solid waste that is to be processed at a waste-
96 to-energy facility because of the need to maintain a sufficient
97 amount of solid waste to ensure the financial viability of the
98 facility.
99
100 The goal shall not be waived entirely and may only be reduced or
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
101 modified to the extent necessary to alleviate the adverse
102 effects of achieving the goal on the financial viability of a
103 county's waste-to-energy facility. Nothing in this subsection
104 shall exempt a county from developing and implementing a
105 recycling program pursuant to this act.
106 (8)(7) In order to assess the progress in meeting the goal
107 set forth in subsection (3) (2), each county shall, by April 1
108 each year, provide information to the department regarding its
109 annual solid waste management program and recycling activities.
110 (a) The information submitted to the department by the
111 county must, at a minimum, include:
112 1. The amount of municipal solid waste disposed of at
113 solid waste disposal facilities, by type of waste such as yard
114 trash, white goods, clean debris, tires, and unseparated solid
115 waste;
116 2. The amount and type of materials from the municipal
117 solid waste stream that were recycled; and
118 3. The percentage of the population participating in
119 various types of recycling activities instituted.
120 (b) Beginning with the data for the 2012 calendar year,
121 the department shall by July 1 each year post on its website the
122 recycling rates of each county for the prior calendar year.
123 (21)(20) In addition to any other penalties provided by
124 law, a local government that does not comply with the
125 requirements of subsections (3) (2) and (5) is (4) shall not be
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
126 eligible for grants from the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund,
127 and the department may notify the Chief Financial Officer to
128 withhold payment of all or a portion of funds payable to the
129 local government by the department from the General Revenue Fund
130 or by the department from any other state fund, to the extent
131 not pledged to retire bonded indebtedness, unless the local
132 government demonstrates that good faith efforts to meet the
133 requirements of subsections (3) (2) and (5) (4) have been made
134 or that the funds are being or will be used to finance the
135 correction of a pollution control problem that spans
136 jurisdictional boundaries.
137 Section 2. Subsections (6) through (14) of section
138 403.707, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (7)
139 through (15), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to
140 that section to read:
141 403.707 Permits.—
142 (6)(a) The department may not issue a construction permit
143 pursuant to this section for a new solid waste disposal facility
144 that uses an ash-producing incinerator or for a waste-to-energy
145 facility if the proposed location of such facility is sited
146 within 1 mile of any impoundment area authorized by Congress
147 with an effective interior storage of at least 100 acres for
148 purposes of capturing, storing, and distributing surface water,
149 improving hydroperiods and hydropatterns in any water
150 conservation area, increasing spatial extent of wetlands,
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
151 benefiting any federally listed threatened and endangered
152 species, flood mitigation, or groundwater recharge.
153 (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to:
154 1. Any canal.
155 2. Any existing construction, current operation, or
156 modification to such structure or operation in existence as of
157 July 1, 2026.
158 3. Any parcel located in a county with a population of
159 less than 1.7 million according to the United States 2020
160 decennial census.
161 Section 3. Paragraph (b) of subsection (6) and subsections
162 (7) and (21) of section 403.703, Florida Statutes, are amended
163 to read:
164 403.703 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
165 (6) "Construction and demolition debris" means discarded
166 materials generally considered to be not water-soluble and
167 nonhazardous in nature, including, but not limited to, steel,
168 glass, brick, concrete, asphalt roofing material, pipe, gypsum
169 wallboard, and lumber, from the construction or destruction of a
170 structure as part of a construction or demolition project or
171 from the renovation of a structure, and includes rocks, soils,
172 tree remains, trees, and other vegetative matter that normally
173 results from land clearing or land development operations for a
174 construction project, including such debris from construction of
175 structures at a site remote from the construction or demolition
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
176 project site. Mixing of construction and demolition debris with
177 other types of solid waste will cause the resulting mixture to
178 be classified as other than construction and demolition debris.
179 The term also includes:
180 (b) Except as provided in s. 403.707(10)(j) s.
181 403.707(9)(j), yard trash and unpainted, nontreated wood scraps
182 and wood pallets from sources other than construction or
183 demolition projects;
184 (7) "County," or any like term, means a political
185 subdivision of the state established pursuant to s. 1, Art. VIII
186 of the State Constitution and, when s. 403.706(20) s.
187 403.706(19) applies, means a special district or other entity.
188 (21) "Municipality," or any like term, means a
189 municipality created pursuant to general or special law
190 authorized or recognized pursuant to s. 2 or s. 6, Art. VIII of
191 the State Constitution and, when s. 403.706(20) s. 403.706(19)
192 applies, means a special district or other entity.
193 Section 4. Subsection (5) of section 403.7049, Florida
194 Statutes, is amended to read:
195 403.7049 Determination of full cost for solid waste
196 management; local solid waste management fees.—
197 (5) In order to assist in achieving the municipal solid
198 waste reduction goal and the recycling provisions of s.
199 403.706(3) s. 403.706(2), a county or a municipality which owns
200 or operates a solid waste management facility is hereby
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1089 2026
201 authorized to charge solid waste disposal fees which may vary
202 based on a number of factors, including, but not limited to, the
203 amount, characteristics, and form of recyclable materials
204 present in the solid waste that is brought to the county's or
205 the municipality's facility for processing or disposal.
206 Section 5. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) and subsection
207 (3) of section 403.705, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
208 403.705 State solid waste management program.—
209 (2) The state solid waste management program shall
210 include, at a minimum:
211 (c) Planning guidelines and technical assistance to
212 counties and municipalities to aid in meeting the municipal
213 solid waste recycling goals established in s. 403.706(3) s.
214 403.706(2).
215 (3) The department shall evaluate and report biennially to
216 the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
217 Representatives on the state's success in meeting the solid
218 waste recycling goal as described in s. 403.706(3) s.
219 403.706(2).
220 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1089-01-c1